dictsource/bn_rules
.group ঠ
        ঠ        t.#V
        _া) ঠ (L11া_             t.#      // generated
        _া) ঠ (L11া              t.#      // generated
        _L12া) ঠ (L11া_          t.#      // generated
        _L12া) ঠ (L11া           t.#      // generated
        _L10) ঠ (L11ু_           t.#      // generated
        _L10) ঠ (L11ু            t.#      // generated
        _L12L10) ঠ (L11ু_        t.#      // generated
        _L12L10) ঠ (L11ু         t.#      // generated
        L10) ঠ (L11ু_            t.#      // generated
        L10) ঠ (L11ু             t.#      // generated
        _L10) ঠ (ডL12L10         t.#      // generated
        _L12L10) ঠ (ডL12L10      t.#      // generated
        L10) ঠ (ডL12L10          t.#      // generated
        _আ) ঠ (L11L10L11         t.#      // generated
        _L12আ) ঠ (L11L10L11      t.#      // generated
        আ) ঠ (L11L10L11          t.#      // generated
        _L10) ঠ (গL12_           t.#      // generated
        _L10) ঠ (গL12            t.#      // generated
        _L12L10) ঠ (গL12_        t.#      // generated
        _L12L10) ঠ (গL12         t.#      // generated
        L10) ঠ (গL12_            t.#      // generated
        L10) ঠ (গL12             t.#      // generated
        _া) ঠ (L11L12র           t.#      // generated
        _L12া) ঠ (L11L12র        t.#      // generated
        া) ঠ (L11L12র            t.#      // generated
        _ি) ঠ (L11া_             t.#      // generated
        _ি) ঠ (L11া              t.#      // generated
        _L12ি) ঠ (L11া_          t.#      // generated
        _L12ি) ঠ (L11া           t.#      // generated
        ি) ঠ (L11া_              t.#      // generated
        ি) ঠ (L11া               t.#      // generated
        _) ঠ (তা_                t.#V     // generated
        _L12) ঠ (তা_             t.#V     // generated
        _L12L12) ঠ (তা_          t.#V     // generated
        ঠ (তা_                   t.#V     // generated
        _L11) ঠ (L11ন_           t.#      // generated
        _L11) ঠ (L11ন            t.#      // generated
        _L12L11) ঠ (L11ন_        t.#      // generated
        _L12L11) ঠ (L11ন         t.#      // generated
        _পL12) ঠ (L11L10_        t.#V     // generated
        _পL12) ঠ (L11L10         t.#V     // generated
        পL12) ঠ (L11L10_         t.#V     // generated
        পL12) ঠ (L11L10          t.#V     // generated
        _লL10) ঠ (L11L12L11      t.#      // generated
        লL10) ঠ (L11L12L11       t.#      // generated
        _L10) ঠ (পL11_           t.#      // generated
        _L10) ঠ (পL11            t.#      // generated
        _L12L10) ঠ (পL11_        t.#      // generated
        _L12L10) ঠ (পL11         t.#      // generated
        L10) ঠ (পL11_            t.#      // generated
        L10) ঠ (পL11             t.#      // generated
        _L10) ঠ (বL12্           t.#      // generated
        _L12L10) ঠ (বL12্        t.#      // generated
        L10) ঠ (বL12্            t.#      // generated
        _খL10) ঠ (_L12           t.#      // generated
        _খL10) ঠ (L11L12_        t.#      // generated
        _খL10) ঠ (L11L12         t.#      // generated
        খL10) ঠ (_L12            t.#      // generated
        খL10) ঠ (L11L12_         t.#      // generated
        খL10) ঠ (L11L12          t.#      // generated
        _L11) ঠ (L11ী_           t.#V     // generated
        _L11) ঠ (L11ী            t.#V     // generated
        _ন) ঠ (L11L10_           t.#      // generated
        _ন) ঠ (L11L10            t.#      // generated
        _L12ন) ঠ (L11L10_        t.#      // generated
        _L12ন) ঠ (L11L10         t.#      // generated
        ন) ঠ (L11L10_            t.#      // generated
        ন) ঠ (L11L10             t.#      // generated
        _জ) ঠ (L11L10_           t.#      // generated
        _জ) ঠ (L11L10            t.#      // generated
        _L12জ) ঠ (L11L10_        t.#      // generated
        _L12জ) ঠ (L11L10         t.#      // generated
        জ) ঠ (L11L10_            t.#      // generated
        জ) ঠ (L11L10             t.#      // generated
        _া) ঠ (L11ে_             t.#      // generated
        _া) ঠ (L11ে              t.#      // generated
        _L12া) ঠ (L11ে_          t.#      // generated
        _L12া) ঠ (L11ে           t.#      // generated
        ্L12া) ঠ (_L12           t.#      // generated
        _L11L10) ঠ (হL12_        t.#      // generated
        _L11L10) ঠ (হL12         t.#      // generated
        L11L10) ঠ (হL12_         t.#      // generated
        L11L10) ঠ (হL12          t.#      // generated
        _L10) ঠ (লL12য           t.#      // generated
        _L12L10) ঠ (লL12য        t.#      // generated
        L10) ঠ (লL12য            t.#      // generated
        _L10) ঠ (চL12_           t.#      // generated
        _L10) ঠ (চL12            t.#      // generated
        _L12L10) ঠ (চL12_        t.#      // generated
        _L12L10) ঠ (চL12         t.#      // generated
        _এ) ঠ (L11L10_           t.#      // generated
        _এ) ঠ (L11L10            t.#      // generated
        _L12এ) ঠ (L11L10_        t.#      // generated
        _L12এ) ঠ (L11L10         t.#      // generated
        এ) ঠ (L11L10_            t.#      // generated
        এ) ঠ (L11L10             t.#      // generated
        L10L12L10) ঠ (L11L12ন    t.#V     // generated
        _L10) ঠ (তে_             t.#      // generated
        _L10) ঠ (তে              t.#      // generated
        _L12L10) ঠ (তে_          t.#      // generated
        _L12L10) ঠ (তে           t.#      // generated
        L10) ঠ (তে_              t.#      // generated
        L10) ঠ (তে               t.#      // generated
        _র) ঠ (L11াL11           t.#      // generated
        _L12র) ঠ (L11াL11        t.#      // generated
        র) ঠ (L11াL11            t.#      // generated
        _L11) ঠ (তে_             t.#      // generated
        _L11) ঠ (লে_             t.#      // generated
        _L11) ঠ (ছে_             t.#      // generated
        _L11) ঠ (লাম_            t.#      // generated
        _L11) ঠ (তাম_            t.#      // generated
        _L11) ঠ (ছি_             t.#      // generated
        _L11) ঠ (ছিল_            t.#      // generated
        _L11) ঠ (লো_             t.#      // generated
        _L11) ঠ (বে_             t.#      // generated
        _L11) ঠ (বো_             t.#      // generated
        _L11) ঠ (লেন_            t.#      // generated
        _L11) ঠ (তেন_            t.#      // generated
        _L11) ঠ (ছেন_            t.#      // generated
        _L11) ঠ (বেন_            t.#      // generated
        _L11) ঠ (তিস_            t.#      // generated
        _L11) ঠ (লি_             t.#      // generated
        _L11) ঠ (ছিস_            t.#      // generated
        ঠ (B     t.#
       
